Hawaii statutes.
§651-68 Proceedings on execution;
appraisers; expiration of lien, result. When an execution for the
enforcement of a judgment is levied upon real or personal property for which an
exemption is authorized under subpart B or C, the judgment creditor may at any
time within sixty days thereafter apply to the court for the appointment of a
person or persons to appraise the value thereof. If such application is not
made within sixty days after the levy of such execution the lien of the
execution shall cease at the expiration of such period, and no execution based
upon the same judgment shall thereafter be levied upon the real or personal
property. [L 1976, c 136, pt of §3; am L 1978, c 46, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next